fst/nom_paradigms.lexc
! 63 — sīmen (N)
LEXICON N63
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:sīmen  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Neut:sēmen  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:sīmeni  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Neut:sēmeni  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:sīmenes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Neut:sēmenes  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:sīmen  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Neut:sēmen  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:sīmenins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:sēmenins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:simenimmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:semenimmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:sīmenin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Neut:sēmenin  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:simenēi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Neut:sēmenes  # ;

! 64 — zmūi (N)
LEXICON N64
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:zmūnin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:zmānin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:zmūni  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:zmāni  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:zmūnes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:zmānes  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:zmūi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Masc:zmōi  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:zmūnins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:zmānins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:zmūnimans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:zmānimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:zmūnin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:zmānin  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:zmūnei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:zmānes  # ;

! 65 — brāti (N)
LEXICON N65
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:brātin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:brātri  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:brātis  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:brāti  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:brātins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:brātrimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:brātin  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:brātei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:brātjai  # ;

! 66 — mūti (N)
LEXICON N66
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:mūtin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:mātin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:mūterei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:māterei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:mūtis  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:mātis  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:mūti  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:māti  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:mūtins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:mātins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:mūterimans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:māterimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:mūtin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:mātin  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:mūtis  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:mātes  # ;

! 67 — dukti (N)
LEXICON N67
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:duktin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:dukterei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:duktis  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:dukti  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:duktins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:dukterimmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:duktin  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:duktis  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:duktes  # ;

! 70 — tīrts (Part)
LEXICON Part70
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:tīrtin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:tīrtjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:tīrtei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:tīrtjai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:tīrtes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:tīrtjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:tirtī  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:tīrtī  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:tīrtins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:tīrtjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:tirtāmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:tirtjāmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:tīrtin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:tīrtjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:tīrtes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:tīrtjas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:tīrtan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:tīrtsmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:tīrtse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:tīrts  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:tīrtans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:tirtēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:tirtēisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:tirtāi  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:tīrtan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:tīrtsmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:tīrtse  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:tīrtan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:tīrtans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:tirtēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:tirtēisan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:tirtāi  # ;

! P27 — abipussis (adjective, 3-gender)
LEXICON A27
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:abipussis  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:abipuššai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:abipussis  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:abipussin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:abipussismu  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:abipussimans  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:abipussin  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:abipussins  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:abipussi  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:abipussis  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:abipussis  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:abipussin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:abipuššai  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:abipussimans  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:abipussin  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:abipussins  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:abipussi  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:abipuššai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:abipussis  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:abipussin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:abipussismu  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:abipussimans  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:abipussi  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:abipussins  # ;

! P3 — reflexive pronoun (oblique only, no nominative)
LEXICON P3
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:swāise   # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:swāise    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:sebbei   # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:sebbei    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:sin      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:sin       # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:swāise   # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:swāise    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:sebbei   # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:sebbei    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:sins     # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:sins      # ;
